Washington statutes.
RCW 46.04.143

Converter gear.

"Converter gear" means an auxiliary axle, booster axle, dolly, or jeep axle.

[ 2010 c 161 s 112.]

NOTES:

Effective date—Intent—Legislation to reconcile chapter 161, Laws of 2010 and other amendments made during the 2010 legislative session—2010 c 161: See notes following RCW 46.04.013.